Alaska statutes. Title 42. Public Utilities and Carriers and Energy Programs.
Article 1. Application of Chapter; Qualifications.

Sec. 42.08.010.
Application of chapter.

This chapter applies to the regulation of in-state natural gas pipelines that provide transportation by contract carriage.

An in-state natural gas pipeline subject exclusively to federal jurisdiction is exempt from this chapter.

History.

(§ 21 ch 11 SLA 2013)

Sec. 42.08.020.
Qualification of the Alaska Gasline Development Corporation; findings.

The Alaska Gasline Development Corporation is financially fit, willing, and able to take the actions, perform the service, and conform to the requirements of this chapter.

The board of directors and the officers of the Alaska Gasline Development Corporation are managerially fit, willing, and able to manage the Alaska Gasline Development Corporation and to take the actions, perform the service, and conform to the requirements of this chapter.

The proposed service, construction, and operation of an in-state natural gas pipeline for which the Alaska Gasline Development Corporation applies for a certificate under this chapter is required by present and future public convenience and necessity.

The findings that the Alaska Gasline Development Corporation is financially fit in (a) of this section and managerially fit in (b) of this section and that an in-state natural gas pipeline is required by present or future public convenience and necessity in (c) of this section are conclusive and binding on the commission.

The commission shall determine whether a person making application under this chapter is technically fit, willing, and able to take the actions, perform the service, and conform to the requirements in this chapter.

History.

(§ 21 ch 11 SLA 2013)